Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9057. MEDINA COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 2

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9057.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "District" means the Medina County Water Control and Improvement District No. 2.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9057.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is:

(1) a conservation and reclamation district in Medina County under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) a municipal corporation.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9057.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land included in the boundaries of the district will benefit from that inclusion.

(c) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9057.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1, Chapter 198, Acts of the 53rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1953, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter O, Chapter 51, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 9057.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board is composed of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9057.101. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and duties provided by general law applicable to a water control and improvement district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9057.102. ACQUISITION OF PROPERTY; LIMIT ON EMINENT DOMAIN POWER. (a) The district may acquire property that is necessary to accomplish the objectives of the district.

(b) To facilitate the acquisition of property, the district may exercise the power of eminent domain available to water control and improvement districts under general law.

(c) The powers granted in this section apply only in Medina County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9057.103. COST OF RELOCATING PROPERTY. If the district's exercise of a power granted by this chapter makes necessary the relocation of a railroad line or right-of-way, the district shall pay the cost of the relocation and any actual and reasonable damage incurred in changing and adjusting the railroad lines and grades.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. BONDS

Sec. 9057.151. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS; BOND ELECTION. (a) The district may issue bonds pursuant to a board order or resolution adopted after the proposition authorizing the bonds is:

(1) submitted to district voters at an election; and

(2) adopted by a majority of the district voters voting at the election.

(b) The district may issue bonds under this section for any purpose permitted to water control and improvement districts and in the manner and to the extent provided by the general laws governing water control and improvement districts.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 9057.152. CERTAIN BOND COVENANTS AUTHORIZED. An order or resolution authorizing the issuance of district bonds may contain any covenant the board considers necessary to ensure:

(1) the creation and maintenance of proper reserves; and

(2) the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.06, eff. April 1, 2017.